Nebraska, session 109, LB380.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 68-974, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
68-974 (1) One or more program integrity contractors may be used to
promote the integrity of the medical assistance program, to assist with
investigations and audits, or to investigate the occurrence of fraud, waste, or
abuse. The contract or contracts may include services for (a) cost-avoidance
through identification of third-party liability, (b) cost recovery of third-
party liability through postpayment reimbursement, (c) casualty recovery of
payments by identifying and recovering costs for claims that were the result of
an accident or neglect and payable by a casualty insurer, and (d) reviews of
claims submitted by providers of services or other individuals furnishing items
and services for which payment has been made to determine whether providers
have been underpaid or overpaid, and to take actions to recover any
overpayments identified or make payment for any underpayment identified.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all program integrity
contractors when conducting a program integrity audit, investigation, or review
shall:
(a) Provide clear written justification to the provider for commencing an
audit;
(b) Review claims within three four years from the date of the payment;
(c) (b) Send a determination letter concluding an audit within one hundred
eighty days after receipt of all requested material from a provider;
(d) Furnish (c) In any records request to a provider, furnish information
sufficient for the provider to identify the patient, procedure, or location in
any records request to a provider. A records request shall be limited to
relevant documents proportional to the services being audited as provided in
subsection (12) of this section;
(e)(i) (d) Develop and implement with the department a procedure with the
department in which an improper payment identified by an audit may be
resubmitted as a claims adjustment, including (A) (i) the resubmission of
claims denied as a result of an interpretation of scope of services not
previously held by the department and (B) , (ii) the resubmission of
documentation when the document provided is incomplete, illegible, or unclear ,
and (iii) the resubmission of documentation when clerical errors resulted in a
denial of claims for services actually provided.
(ii) If a service was provided and sufficiently documented but denied
because it was determined by the department or the contractor that a different
service should have been provided, the department or the contractor shall (A)
disallow the difference between the payment for the service that was provided
and the payment for the service that should have been provided or (B) allow
ninety days after the notice of overpayment for the provider to adjust a claim
if the service was provided and sufficiently documented, but denied because it
was determined by the department or contractor that a different service should
have been billed;
(f) (e) Utilize a licensed health care professional from the specialty
area of practice being audited to establish relevant audit methodology
consistent with (i) state-issued medicaid provider handbooks and (ii)
established clinical practice guidelines and acceptable standards of care
established by professional or specialty organizations responsible for setting
such standards of care;
(g) Schedule onsite audits with advance notice of not less than ten
business days and make a good faith effort to establish a mutually agreed-upon
time and date for the onsite audit; and
(h) (f) Provide a detailed written notification and explanation of an
adverse determination that would result in partial or full recoupment of
payment. The written notification and explanation shall include: (i) The full
name of the beneficiary who received the health care services for which
overpayment was made; (ii) the dates of service; (iii) the amount of the
overpayment; (iv) the claim number or other identifying numbers; (v) a detailed
explanation of the basis for the overpayment determination, including each
finding and supporting evidence upon which the determination is based; (vi) the
method in which payment was made, including, the date of payment and, if
applicable, the check number; (vii) the appropriate procedure to submit a
-1-

LB380 LB380
2025 2025
claims adjustment under subdivision (e) of this subsection; (viii) a statement
that the provider may appeal the determination as provided in subsection (16)
of this section; (ix) the method by which recovery of the overpayment will be
made if recovery is initiated; and (x) a statement that an overpayment shall
not be recouped for at least sixty days after the date of notice of adverse
findings. includes the reason for the adverse determination, the medical
criteria on which the adverse determination was based, an explanation of the
provider's appeal rights, and, if applicable, the appropriate procedure to
submit a claims adjustment in accordance with subdivision (2)(d) of this
section; and
(g) Schedule any onsite audits with advance notice of not less than ten
business days and make a good faith effort to establish a mutually agreed-upon
time and date for the onsite audit.
(3) Any provision of a contract between a third-party payer and a provider
or beneficiary that violates subsection (2) of this section is unenforceable.
(4) (3) A program integrity contractor retained by the department or the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services shall work with the
department at the commencement start of a recovery audit to review this section
and section 68-973 and any other relevant state policies, procedures,
regulations, and guidelines regarding program integrity audits. The program
integrity contractor shall comply with this section regarding audit procedures.
A copy of the statutes, policies, and procedures shall be specifically
maintained in the audit records to support the audit findings.
(5)(a) (4) The department shall exclude from the scope of review of
recovery audit contractors:
(i) A any claim processed or paid through a capitated medicaid managed
care program;
(ii) A claim that is not a primary insurance claim; and
(iii) A claim . The department shall exclude from the scope of review of
program integrity contractors any claims that is are currently being audited or
that has have been audited by a program integrity contractor, by the
department, or by another entity.
(b) Claims processed or paid through a capitated medicaid managed care
program shall be coordinated between the department, the contractor, and the
managed care organization. All such audits shall be coordinated as to scope,
method, and timing. The contractor and the department shall avoid duplication
or simultaneous audits.
(c) No payment shall be recovered in a medical necessity review in which
the provider has obtained prior authorization for the service and the service
was performed as authorized.
(6) (5) Extrapolated overpayments are not allowed under the Medical
Assistance Act without evidence of a sustained pattern of error, an excessively
high error rate, or the agreement of the provider.
(7) (6) The department may contract with one or more persons to support a
health insurance premium assistance payment program.
(8) (7) The department may enter into any other contracts deemed to
increase the efforts to promote the integrity of the medical assistance
program.
(9) A contract (8) Contracts entered into under the authority of this
section may be on a contingent fee basis if (a) the contract is in compliance
with federal law and regulations, (b) the contingent fees are not greater than
twelve and one-half percent of the amounts recovered, and (c) the contract
provides that contingency fee payments are based on amounts recovered, not
amounts identified. Contracts entered into on a contingent fee basis shall
provide that contingent fee payments are based upon amounts recovered, not
amounts identified. Whether the contract is a contingent fee contract or
otherwise, the contractor shall not recover overpayments by the department
until all appeals have been completed unless there is a credible allegation of
fraudulent activity by the provider, the contractor has referred the claims to
the department for investigation, and an investigation has commenced. In that
event, the contractor may recover overpayment prior to the conclusion of the
appeals process. In any contract between the department and a program integrity
contractor, the payment or fee provided for identification of overpayments
shall be the same provided for identification of underpayments. Contracts shall
be in compliance with federal law and regulations when pertinent, including a
limit on contingent fees of no more than twelve and one-half percent of amounts
recovered, and initial contracts shall be entered into as soon as practicable
under such federal law and regulations.
(10) The payment or fee for identification of overpayments shall be the
same as that for identification of underpayments in any contract between the
department and a program integrity contractor. The contractor shall not recover
an overpayment by the department until all appeals have been exhausted unless
there is a credible allegation of provider fraud and: (a) The contractor
provides the provider with a statement of the reasons for the decision,
including a determination on each finding upon which such decision was based,
(b) the contractor refers the claim to the department for investigation, and
(c) an investigation has commenced.
(11) (9) All amounts recovered and savings generated as a result of this
section shall be returned to the medical assistance program.
(12) (10) Records requests made by a program integrity contractor in any
one-hundred-eighty-day period shall be limited to not more than two hundred
records for the specific service being reviewed. The contractor shall allow a
provider no less than forty-five days to respond to and comply with a records
-2-

LB380 LB380
2025 2025
request. If the contractor can demonstrate a significant provider error rate
relative to an audit of records, the contractor may make a request to the
department to initiate an additional records request regarding the subject
under review for the purpose of further review and validation. The contractor
shall not make the request until the time period for the appeals process has
expired.
(13) (11) On an annual basis, the department shall require the recovery
audit contractor to compile and publish on the department's Internet website
metrics related to the performance of each recovery audit contractor. Such
metrics shall include: (a) The number and type of issues reviewed; (b) the
number of medical records requested; (c) the number of overpayments and the
aggregate dollar amounts associated with the overpayments identified by the
contractor; (d) the number of underpayments and the aggregate dollar amounts
associated with the identified underpayments; (e) the duration of audits from
initiation to time of completion; (f) the number of adverse determinations and
the overturn rating of those determinations in the appeal process; (g) the
number of appeals filed by providers and the disposition status of such
appeals; (h) the contractor's compensation structure and dollar amount of
compensation; and (i) a copy of the department's contract with the recovery
audit contractor.
(14) (12) The program integrity contractor, in conjunction with the
department, shall perform educational and training programs for providers that
encompass a summary of audit results, a description of common issues, problems,
and mistakes identified through audits and reviews, and opportunities for
improvement.
(15) A provider (13) Providers shall be allowed to submit records
requested as a result of an audit in electronic format, including compact disc,
digital versatile disc, or other electronic format deemed appropriate by the
department or via facsimile transmission, at the request of the provider.
(16)(a) (14)(a) A provider shall have the right to appeal a determination
made by a the program integrity contractor. The program integrity contractor
shall not recoup an overpayment until all appeals have been exhausted unless
there is a credible allegation of fraud and the contractor complies with the
requirements in subsection (10) of this section. A program integrity contractor
shall provide (i) appeal procedures and timelines at the commencement of any
audit and (ii) a contact telephone number and an email address or physical
address for submission of written questions regarding an audit and the appeal
process. A program integrity contractor shall respond to a question submitted
by a provider no later than ten business days after the date of submission.
(b) The contractor shall establish an informal consultation process to be
utilized prior to the issuance of a final determination. Within thirty days
after receipt of notification of a preliminary finding from the contractor, the
provider may request an informal consultation with the contractor to discuss
and attempt to resolve the findings or portion of such findings in the
preliminary findings letter. The request shall be made to the contractor. The
consultation shall occur within thirty days after the provider's request for
informal consultation, unless otherwise agreed to by both parties.
(c) Within thirty days after notification of an adverse determination, a
provider may request an administrative appeal of the adverse determination as
set forth in the Administrative Procedure Act.
(17) No later than (15) The department shall by December 1 of each year,
the department shall submit an electronic report to the Legislature on the
status of the contracts, including the parties, the programs and issues
addressed, the estimated cost recovery, and the savings accrued as a result of
the contracts. Such report shall be filed electronically.
(18) (16) For purposes of this section:
(a) Adverse determination means any decision rendered by a program
integrity contractor or recovery audit contractor that results in a payment to
a provider for a claim for service being reduced or rescinded;
(b) Credible allegation of fraud means an allegation, which has been
verified by the department, from any source, including, but not limited to, the
following: (i) A fraud hotline tip verified by further evidence; (ii) claims
data mining; or (iii) a pattern identified through provider audits, civil false
claims cases, and law enforcement investigations. Allegations are credible when
they have indicia of reliability and the department has reviewed all
allegations, facts, and evidence carefully and acts judiciously on a case-by-
case basis;
(c) (b) Extrapolated overpayment means an overpayment amount obtained by
calculating claims denials and reductions from a medical records review based
on a statistical sampling of a claims universe;
(d) Fraud means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a
person with the knowledge that the deception could result in an unauthorized
benefit to any person. It includes an act that constitutes fraud under
applicable federal or state law;
(e) Fraud hotline tip means a complaint or other communication submitted
through a fraud reporting telephone number or website, including a fraud
hotline administered by a health plan or the federal Department of Health and
Human Services Office of Inspector General;
(f) (c) Person means bodies politic and corporate, societies, communities,
the public generally, individuals, partnerships, limited liability companies,
joint-stock companies, and associations;
(g) (d) Program integrity audit means an audit conducted by the federal
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, the department, or the federal
-3-

LB380 LB380
2025 2025
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services with the coordination and
cooperation of the department;
(h) (e) Program integrity contractor means private entities with which the
department or the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services contracts
to carry out integrity responsibilities under the medical assistance program,
including, but not limited to, recovery audits, integrity audits, and unified
program integrity audits, in order to identify underpayments and overpayments
and recoup overpayments; and
(i) (f) Recovery audit contractor means private entities with which the
department contracts to audit claims for medical assistance, identify
underpayments and overpayments, and recoup overpayments.
Sec. 2. Section 68-982, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-982 (1) An eligible provider's supplemental reimbursement pursuant to
the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act shall be calculated and paid as
follows:
(a) The supplemental reimbursement shall not exceed equal the amount of
federal financial participation received as a result of the claims submitted
pursuant to the act; and
(b) In no instance may the amount certified pursuant to section 68-985,
when combined with the amount received from all other sources of reimbursement
from the medical assistance program, exceed one hundred percent of actual
costs, as determined pursuant to the medicaid state plan, for ground emergency
medical transport services.
(2) The department may distribute supplemental reimbursement shall be
distributed exclusively to eligible providers under a payment method based on
ground emergency medical transport services provided to medicaid beneficiaries
by eligible providers on the a per-transport basis of actual and allowable
costs that are or other federally permissible basis.
Sec. 3. Section 68-985, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-985 If a governmental entity elects to seek supplemental reimbursement
pursuant to the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act on behalf of an eligible
provider owned or operated by the entity, the governmental entity shall:
(1) Certify, in conformity with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. 433.51, as
such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, including any other applicable
federal requirements, that the claimed expenditures for ground emergency
medical transport services are eligible for federal financial participation;
(2) Provide evidence supporting the certification as specified by the
department;
(3) Submit data as specified by the department to determine the
appropriate amounts to claim as expenditures qualifying for federal financial
participation; and
(4) Keep, maintain, and have readily retrievable any records specified by
the department to fully disclose reimbursement amounts to which the eligible
provider is entitled and any other records required by the federal Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services.
Sec. 4. Section 68-986, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-986 (1) On or before January 1, 2026 2018, the department may seek any
necessary federal approvals for the implementation of shall submit an
application to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United
States Department of Health and Human Services amending the medicaid state plan
to provide for the supplemental reimbursement rate for ground emergency medical
transport services as specified in the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act.
(2) The department may limit the program to those costs that are allowable
expenditures under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396
et seq., as such act and sections existed on January 1, 2025 April 1, 2017.
Without such federal approval, the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act may
not be implemented.
(3) The intergovernmental transfer program authorized in section 68-983
shall be implemented only if and to the extent federal financial participation
is available and is not otherwise jeopardized and any necessary federal
approval has been obtained.
(4) To the extent that the chief executive officer of the department
determines that the payments made pursuant to section 68-983 do not comply with
federal medicaid requirements, the chief executive officer may return or not
accept an intergovernmental transfer and may adjust payments as necessary to
comply with federal medicaid requirements.
Sec. 5. Section 68-987, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-987 (1) The department may shall submit claims for federal financial
participation for the expenditures for the services described in subsection (2)
of section 68-986 that are allowable expenditures under federal law.
(2) The department may shall annually submit any necessary materials to
the federal government to provide assurances that claims for federal financial
participation will include only those expenditures that are allowable under
federal law.
(3) If either a final judicial determination is made by any court of
appellate jurisdiction or a final determination is made by the administrator of
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that the supplemental
reimbursement provided for in the Ground Emergency Medical Transport Act act
shall be made to any provider not described in this section, the chief
-4-

LB380 LB380
2025 2025
executive officer of the department shall execute a declaration stating that
the determination has been made and such supplemental reimbursement becomes
inoperative on the date of such determination.
Sec. 6. Section 68-988, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
68-988 To the extent federal approval is obtained, the increased
capitation payments under section 68-983 may commence for dates of service on
or after January 1, 2026 2018.
Sec. 7. Section 68-995, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-995 (1) All contracts and agreements relating to the medical assistance
program governing at-risk managed care service delivery for health services
entered into by the department and existing on or after August 11, 2020, shall:
(a) (1) Provide a definition and cap on administrative spending such that
(i) (a) administrative expenditures do not include profit greater than the
contracted amount, (ii) (b) any administrative spending is necessary to improve
the health status of the population to be served, and (iii) (c) administrative
expenditures do not include contractor incentives. Administrative spending
shall not under any circumstances exceed twelve percent. Such spending shall be
tracked by the contractor and reported quarterly to the department and
electronically to the Clerk of the Legislature;
(b) (2) Provide a definition of annual contractor profits and losses and
restrict such profits and losses under the contract so that profit shall not
exceed a percentage specified by the department but not more than three percent
per year as a percentage of the aggregate of all income and revenue earned by
the contractor and related parties, including parent and subsidiary companies
and risk-bearing partners, under the contract;
(c) (3) Provide for return of (i) (a) any remittance if the contractor
does not meet the minimum medical loss ratio, (ii) (b) any unearned incentive
funds, and (iii) (c) any other funds in excess of the contractor limitations
identified in state or federal statute or contract to the State Treasurer for
credit to the Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund;
(d) (4) Provide for a minimum medical loss ratio of eighty-five percent of
the aggregate of all income and revenue earned by the contractor and related
parties under the contract;
(e) (5) Provide that contractor incentives, in addition to potential
profit, be up to two percent of the aggregate of all income and revenue earned
by the contractor and related parties under the contract; and
(f) (6) Be reviewed and awarded competitively and in full compliance with
the procurement requirements of the State of Nebraska.
(2) A contractor shall:
(a) Not impose quantitative treatment limitations, or financial
restrictions, limitations, or requirements, on the provision of mental health
or substance use disorder services that are more restrictive than the
predominant restrictions, limitations, or requirements imposed on substantially
all benefit coverage for other conditions;
(b) Maintain an adequate provider network to provide mental health and
substance use disorder services;
(c) Apply criteria in accordance with generally recognized standards of
care and make utilization review policies available to the public, providers,
and recipients through electronic or paper means when performing a utilization
review of mental health or substance use disorder services; and
(d) Not rescind or modify an authorization for a mental health or
substance use disorder service after the provider renders the service pursuant
to a determination of medical necessity, except in cases of fraud or a
violation of a provider's contract with a health insurer.
Sec. 8. Section 68-996, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
68-996 (1) The Medicaid Managed Care Excess Profit Fund is created. The
fund shall contain money returned to the State Treasurer pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c) (3) of section 68-995.
(2) The fund shall first be used to offset any losses under subdivision
(1)(b) (2) of section 68-995 and then to provide for (a) services addressing
the health needs of adults and children under the Medical Assistance Act,
including filling service gaps, (b) providing system improvements, (c)
providing evidence-based early intervention home visitation programs, (d)
providing medical respite services, (e) translation and interpretation
services, (f) providing coverage for continuous glucose monitors as described
in section 68-911, (g) providing other services sustaining access to care, (h)
the Nebraska Prenatal Plus Program, and (i) providing grants pursuant to the
Intergenerational Care Facility Incentive Grant Program as determined by the
Legislature. The fund shall only be used for the purposes described in this
section.
(3) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any
investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to
the General Fund.
Sec. 9. The Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of
Health and Human Services shall:
(1) Require contractor compliance with federal and state laws and rules
and regulations applicable to coverage for mental health or substance use
disorder services including early and periodic screening and diagnostic and
-5-

LB380 LB380
2025 2025
treatment services for children and youth in the medical assistance program;
(2) Make public the surveys, financial analyses, and contract audits and
parity reports prepared by a contractor and the results of parity compliance
reports;
(3) Ensure access to mental health and substance use disorder service
providers, including access parity with medical and surgical service providers,
through regulation and review of claims, provider reimbursement procedures,
network adequacy, and provider reimbursement rate adequacy;
(4) Establish a monthly electronic communication system with all health
care providers in the medical assistance program relating to any amendment or
other change in the contracts with medicaid managed care organizations;
(5) Define network adequacy; and
(6) Annually post criteria used by the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term
Care to assess network adequacy and each managed care organization's compliance
on the Department of Health and Human Services website.
Sec. 10. Original sections 68-982, 68-985, 68-986, 68-987, and 68-988,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 68-974, 68-995, and 68-996,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-6-